North Carolina, session 2025, HB729.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-275(45) reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-275. Property classified and excluded from the tax base.
The following classes of property are designated special classes under Article V, Sec. 2(2),
of the North Carolina Constitution and are excluded from tax:
…
(45) Eighty percent (80%) Forty percent (40%) of the appraised value of a solar
energy electric system. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "solar
energy electric system" means all equipment used directly and exclusively for
the conversion of solar energy to electricity."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to taxes
imposed for taxable years beginning on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 62-110.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) The Commission shall not issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity for
a utility-scale solar project, as defined in G.S. 130A-309.240(a)(6), that is not a qualifying small
power production facility under the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policy Act, as defined in
18 C.F.R. § 292.203(a), unless the utility-scale solar project is to be sited on property meeting
any of the following criteria:
(1) The property is a brownfields property as defined in G.S. 130A-310.31, and
the developer of the project enters into a brownfields agreement with the
Department of Environmental Quality pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.32.
(2) The property is not currently being used for agricultural or horticultural
production.
(3) The property is timberland that has been clear-cut harvested and is not in
production at the time of application."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
applications for a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a utility-scale solar project
received on or after that date.
*H729-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Section 4 of S.L. 2023-58 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 4. This act becomes effective as follows:
(1) Section 2(a) of this act is effective when it becomes law, except as follows:
a. The requirements for decommissioning and registration established
under G.S. 130A-309.240(b) and (e), respectively, as enacted by
Section 2(a) of this act, become effective November 1, 2025, and apply
to utility-scale solar projects constructed prior to or after that date. The
owner of a utility-scale solar project shall register with the Department
as follows: (i) by November 1, 2025, or at least 90 days prior to the
commencement of construction of the project if the project is
constructed after November 1, 2025; and (ii) at least 90 days prior to
commencement of rebuild or expansion of a utility-scale solar project.
b. The requirements for submittal of a decommissioning plan and
financial assurance established under G.S. 130A-309.240(c) and (d),
respectively, as enacted by Section 2(a) of this act, become effective
November 1, 2025, December 1, 2026, and shall only apply to (i)
utility-scale solar projects for which applications for certificates of
public convenience and necessity are pending or submitted on or after
the effective date of this act and (ii) utility-scale solar projects that are
generating solar energy or are interconnected to a transmission facility
on the date this act becomes effective, only if the project is rebuilt or
expanded, as those terms are defined by G.S. 130A-309.240(a)(2) and
(a)(4), after the effective date of this act, in which case the project shall
be subject to the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.240(c) and (d).
utility-scale solar projects constructed prior to or after that date. The
owner of a utility-scale solar project shall submit a decommissioning
plan and establish financial assurance (i) by November 1, 2025, or
prior to commencement of construction of the project if the project is
constructed after November 1, 2025, and (ii) prior to commencement
of rebuild or expansion of a utility-scale solar project.by December 1,
2026.
(2) The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law."
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 729-First Edition